Washington statutes.
RCW 15.88.150

Deposit of moneys.

The commission shall deposit moneys collected under RCW 15.88.130 in a separate account in the name of the commission in any bank that is a state depositary. All expenditures and disbursements made from this account under this chapter may be made without the necessity of a specific legislative appropriation. None of the provisions of RCW 43.01.050 apply to this account or to the moneys received, collected, or expended as provided in RCW 15.88.120 through 15.88.160.

[ 1988 c 257 s 4.]